test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lattee_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - lättee: # contracted
    käärbis+N+Sg+Nom: lättee
    käärbis+N+Sg+Gen: lättee
    käärbis+N+Sg+Acc: lättee
    käärbis+N+Sg+Ill: lättei
    käärbis+N+Sg+Loc: lättest
    käärbis+N+Sg+Com: lättein
    käärbis+N+Sg+Abe: lätteettáá
    käärbis+N+Ess: lätten
    käärbis+N+Par: lätted
    käärbis+N+Pl+Nom: lätteeh
    käärbis+N+Pl+Gen: lättei
    käärbis+N+Pl+Acc: lätteid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Ill: lätteid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Loc: lättein
    käärbis+N+Pl+Com: lätteiguin
    käärbis+N+Pl+Abe: lätteittáá
